Maryland, session 2025, SB0078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–704.
(a) A person shall register with the person’s supervising authority if the person
is:
(1) a tier I sex offender;
(2) a tier II sex offender;
(3) a tier III sex offender; or
(4) a sex offender who is required to register by another jurisdiction, a
federal, military, or tribal court, or a foreign government, and who is not a resident of this
State, and who enters this State:
(i) to begin residing or to habitually live;
(ii) to carry on employment;
(iii) to attend a public or private educational institution, including a
secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education, as a
full–time or part–time student; or
(iv) as a transient.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person is no longer subject to
registration under this subtitle if:

SENATE BILL 78 3
(1) the underlying conviction requiring registration is reversed, vacated, or
set aside; or
(2) the registrant is pardoned for the underlying conviction.
(c) (1) A person who has been adjudicated delinquent for an act that, if
committed by an adult, would constitute a violation of § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal
Law Article, § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article as the sections existed before
October 1, 2017, or § 3–307(a)(1) [or], (2), OR (3) or § 3–308(b)(1) of the Criminal Law
Article involving conduct described in § 3–301(e)(2) of the Criminal Law Article, shall
register with the person’s supervising authority if:
(i) the person was a minor who was at least 13 years old at the time
the delinquent act was committed;
(ii) the State’s Attorney or the Department of Juvenile Services
requests that the person be required to register;
(iii) 90 days prior to the time the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over the
person terminates under § 3–8A–07 of the Courts Article, the court, after a hearing,
determines under a clear and convincing evidence standard that the person is at significant
risk of committing a sexually violent offense or an offense for which registration as a tier II
sex offender or tier III sex offender is required; and
(iv) the person is at least 18 years old.
(2) If the person has committed a delinquent act that would cause the court
to make a determination regarding registration under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) the State’s Attorney shall serve written notice to the person or
the person’s counsel at least 30 days before a hearing to determine if the person is required
to register under this section; and
(ii) the Department of Juvenile Services shall:
1. provide the court with any information necessary to make
the determination; and
2. conduct any follow–up the court requires.
(3) The form of petitions and all other pleadings under this subsection and,
except as otherwise provided under Title 3 of the Courts Article, the procedures to be
followed by the court under this subsection shall be specified in the Maryland Rules.
(4) The court may order an evaluation of the person in making the
determination under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

SENATE BILL 78
11–704.1.
(a) In this section, “juvenile registrant” means a person who is required to be
included in the registry of juvenile sex offenders under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) A person shall be included in a registry of juvenile sex offenders that is
maintained by the Department separately from the sex offender registry if:
(1) the person has been adjudicated delinquent for an act that, if committed
by an adult:
(i) would constitute a violation of § 3–303, § 3–304, or § 3–307(a)(1)
[or], (2), OR (3) of the Criminal Law Article; or
(ii) would constitute a violation of § 3–305 or § 3–306(a)(1) or (2) of
the Criminal Law Article as the sections existed before October 1, 2017; and
(2) the person was a minor who was at least 14 years old at the time the
delinquent act was committed.
(c) The registry of juvenile sex offenders shall be accessible only by law
enforcement personnel for law enforcement purposes.
(d) When the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over a juvenile registrant terminates
under § 3–8A–07 of the Courts Article, the juvenile registrant shall be removed from the
registry.
(e) A juvenile registrant shall appear in person at a location designated by the
Department of Juvenile Services every 3 months to:
(1) update and verify with the Department of Juvenile Services the
information included in the registry of juvenile sex offenders under this section; and
(2) allow the Department of Juvenile Services to take a digital image of the
juvenile registrant.
11–722.
(e) (1) A registrant or juvenile registrant who is a student may receive an
education in accordance with State law in any of the following locations:
(i) a location other than a public or nonpublic elementary or
secondary school, including by:
1. participating in the Home and Hospital Teaching Program
for Students; or

SENATE BILL 78 5
2. participating in or attending a program approved by a
county board under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
(ii) a Regional Institute for Children and Adolescents; or
(iii) a nonpublic educational program as provided by § 8–406 of the
Education Article if:
1. the registrant or juvenile registrant has notified an agent
or employee of the nonpublic educational program that the registrant or juvenile registrant
is required to register under this subtitle; and
2. the registrant or juvenile registrant has been given
specific written permission by an agent or employee of the nonpublic educational program
to attend the nonpublic educational program.
(2) Each county board shall develop and adopt a policy that enables a
registrant or juvenile registrant who is a student to receive an education as described under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The State Board shall develop and adopt guidelines and a model policy
to assist a county board with the development of a policy under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
Article – Education
7–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(6) “Reportable offense” means an offense that:
(i) Occurred off school premises;
(ii) Did not occur at an event sponsored by the school; and
(iii) Involved any of the following:
1. A crime of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
2. Any of the offenses enumerated in [§ 3–8A–03(e)(4)] §
3–8A–03(D)(4) of the Courts Article;
3. A violation of § 4–101, § 4–102, § 4–203, or § 4–204 of the
Criminal Law Article;

SENATE BILL 78
4. A violation of § 5–602, § 5–603, § 5–604, § 5–605, § 5–606,
§ 5–607, § 5–608, § 5–608.1, § 5–609, § 5–612, § 5–613, § 5–614, § 5–617, § 5–618, § 5–627,
or § 5–628 of the Criminal Law Article;
5. A violation of § 4–503, § 9–504, or § 9–505 of the Criminal
Law Article;
6. A violation of § 6–102, § 6–103, § 6–104, or § 6–105 of the
Criminal Law Article;
7. A violation of § 9–802 or § 9–803 of the Criminal Law
Article;
8. A violation of § 3–203 of the Criminal Law Article;
9. A violation of § 6–301 of the Criminal Law Article;
10. A violation of § 9–302, § 9–303, or § 9–305 of the Criminal
Law Article;
11. A violation of § 7–105 of the Criminal Law Article;
12. A violation of § 6–202 of the Criminal Law Article; [or]
13. A violation of § 10–606 of the Criminal Law Article; OR
14. A VIOLATION OF § 3–307(A)(1), (2), OR (3) OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(b) If a student is arrested for a reportable offense or an offense that is related to
the student’s membership in a criminal organization, the law enforcement agency making
the arrest:
(1) Shall notify the following individuals of the arrest and the charges
within 24 hours of the arrest or as soon as practicable:
(i) The local superintendent;
(ii) The school principal; and
(iii) For a school that has a school security officer, the school security
officer; and
(2) May notify the State’s Attorney of the arrest and charges.

SENATE BILL 78 7
(c) The State’s Attorney shall promptly notify either the local superintendent or
the school principal of the disposition of the reportable offense required to be reported under
subsection (b) of this section.
7–312.
(A) IF A CHILD HAS BEEN CONVICTED OR ADJUDICATED DELINQUENT OF
RAPE OR A SEXUAL OFFENSE THAT, IF COMMITTED BY AN ADULT, WOULD
CONSTITUTE A FELONY, THE CHILD IS PROHIBITED FROM IN–PERSON ATTENDANCE
AT A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT RECEIVES STATE FUNDS.
(B) (1) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL PROVIDE ALTERNATIVE
EDUCATIONAL OPTIONS FOR CHILDREN PROHIBITED FROM IN–PERSON
ATTENDANCE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE ALTERNATIVE EDUCATIONAL OPTIONS PROVIDED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ALIGN WITH THE REQUIRED POLICY ADOPTED BY COUNTY
BOARDS UNDER § 11–722(E) OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.